Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
636C]

UNIFORM
ENFORCEMENT OF FOREIGN JUDGMENTS ACT

Section

636C-1 Short title

636C-2 Definition

636C-3 Filing and status of foreign judgments

636C-4 Notice of filing

636C-5 Stay

636C-6 Fees

636C-7 Optional procedures

636C-8 Uniformity of interpretation

Cross References

Foreign money claims, see chapter 658B.

Uniform foreign-country money judgments recognition act, see
chapter 658F.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next